en: purée
be: Пюрэ
bg: Пюре
bn: পিউরি
ca: puré
cs: pyré
da: puré
de: Püree
el: πουρές
eo: pureo
es: puré
et: püree
eu: Pure
fa: پوره
fi: pyree, pyre, sose
fo: greytur
fr: purée
fy: brij
he: מחית
hr: pire
hu: püré
hy: Խյուս
io: Pureo
it: purè, purea
ja: ピュレ
jv: Puré
ka: პიურე
ko: 퓌레
lv: biezens
nb: puré
nl: puree
nn: puré
pa: ਪਿਊਰੇ
pl: Purée, przecier, przeciery, przecier z, przeciery z
pt: puré
ro: piure
ru: пюре
sq: pire
sv: puré
th: ปูว์เร
uk: Пюре
zh: 原漿

en: concentrated purée
de: konzentriertes Püree
es: Puré concentrado
fi: pyreetiiviste
fr: purée concentrée
hr: koncentrirani pire
it: purea concentrata
nl: geconcentreerde puree

en: fiber, fibre, dietary fibre, dietary fiber, dietary fibers
af: Vesel
ar: ألياف النسيج
ba: Сүстәр
be: валакно
bg: влакно, влакнини, фибри
bn: fiber
bs: Vlakno
ca: Fibra, fibra alimentaria, fibres vegetals
cs: vlákno, vláknina
cv: Чĕлкĕм
da: fiber
de: Faser, Nahrungsfasern
el: ίνα
eo: fibro
es: fibra, fibra alimentaria, fibras vegetales
et: Kiud
eu: zuntz
fa: الیاف
fi: kuitu, ravintokuitu
fr: fibre, fibre alimentaire, fibres alimentaires
ga: Snáithín
he: סיב
hr: vlakna, vlakno, prehrambena vlakna
hu: szálasanyag
hy: մանրաթելեր
id: Serat
io: Fibro
is: Trefjar
it: fibra, fibra alimentare, fibra di
ja: 繊維
kk: Волокнит
kn: ನಾರು
ko: 섬유
lt: skaidula
lv: Šķiedra
mk: влакно
ml: നാര്
ms: Serat
nb: fiber
ne: रेसा
nl: vezel, voedingsvezel, voedingsvezels, vezels
nn: fiber
oc: fibra
pl: włókno, błonnik, błonniki
pt: fibra, fibra alimentar, fibras alimentares
qu: Q'aytucha
ro: Fibră
ru: волокна
sd: ريشو
sh: Vlakno
sk: vlákno, vláknina
sq: Fibrat
sr: влакно
sv: fiber, kostfiber, fibrer
ta: இழை
te: fiber
tr: Lif
tt: сүс
uk: волокно
zh: 纤维

en: soluble fibre, soluble fiber
ca: fibra soluble
de: lösliche Ballaststoffe
es: fibra soluble
fr: fibres solubles
hr: topivih vlakana
it: fibra solubile
ja: 水溶性食物繊維
nl: oplosbare vezels
pl: błonnik rozpuszczalny, rozpuszczalny błonnik

en: flax seed fiber, flaxseed fiber, flax fiber, flax fibers
da: hørfrøfiber
fi: pellavansiemenkuitu
fr: fibre de lin, fibres de lin, fibres de graines de lin
hr: vlakna sjemenki lana
it: fibra di semi di lino
no: linfrøfiber
sv: linfröfiber

en: sugarcane fiber, sugarcane fibers
da: sukkerrørsfiber
fr: fibre de canne à sucre, fibres de canne à sucre
hr: vlakna šećerne trske
it: fibra di canna da zucchero
pl: błonnik z trzciny cukrowej
pt: fibra de cana-de-açúcar
sv: sockerrörsfiber, sockerrörfiber

en: betaglucan, β-glucane, beta glucan
da: beta-glucan
de: Beta-Glucane, β-Glucane
es: beta glucano, β-glucano
fr: bêta-glucane, betaglucane, β-glucane
it: betaglucano
sv: betaglukan

en: inulin
ar: إينولين
be: Інулін
bg: Инулин
bs: Inulin
ca: Inulina
cs: Inulin
da: Inulin
de: Inulin
eo: Inulino
es: Inulina
eu: Inulina
fa: اینولین
fi: inuliini, inuliinikuitu
fr: inuline
gl: Inulina
he: אינולין
hr: inulin, prehrambena vlakna Beneo, inulin od cikorije, vlakna inulina, inulinsko vlakno
hu: Inulin
hy: Ինուլին
id: Inulin
io: Inulino
it: Inulina
ja: イヌリン
jv: Inulin
lt: Inulinas
lv: inulīns
mk: Инулин
nb: inulin
nl: Inuline
nn: Inulin
pl: Inulina, inulina z cykorii
pt: Inulina
ro: Inulina
ru: инулин
sh: inulin
sl: Inulin
sr: Инулин
sv: inulin, inulinfiber
th: อินูลิน
tr: İnülin
uk: Інулін
uz: Inulin
vi: Inulin
zh: 菊粉

en: vegetable fiber, vegetable fibers, plant fiber, plant fibre
bg: растителни влакна, растителни влакнини, растителни фибри, зеленчукови фибри
ca: fibra vegetal
cs: rostlinná textilní vlákna
da: plantefiber, vegetabilsk fiber
de: pflanzliche Fasern, Pflanzenfaser, Pflanzenfasern, pflanzliche Ballaststoffe
eo: planta fibro
es: fibra vegetal
fi: kasvikuitu, kasvikuidut
fr: fibre végétale, fibres végétales, fibres alimentaires végétales
he: סיבי ירקות, סיבי ירק, סיבים מן הצומח, סיבים צמחוניים, סיבים צמחיים
hr: biljna vlakna
hu: növényi rostok, növényi rost
it: fibre vegetali, fibra vegetale
ja: 植物繊維
ko: 식물섬유
lv: dārzeņu šķiedra
nb: vegetabilsk fiber, plantefiber
nl: plantaardige vezel, plantaardige vezels
nn: plantefiber
pl: Błonnik roślinny, błonniki roślinne
pt: fibra vegetal
ro: Fibra vegetala, fibre vegetale
ru: растительное волокно
sl: rastlinske vlaknine
sr: biljna vlakna
sv: vegetabilisk fiber, vegetabiliska fibrer, vegetabilisk fibrer, växtfiber, växtfibrer

fr: fibres de tomate, fibre de tomate
nl: tomatenvezel

en: pea fiber
bg: грахови фибри
ca: fibra de pèsol, fibra vegetal de pèsol
de: Erbsenfaser, Erbsenfasern
es: fibra de guisante
fi: hernekuitu
fr: fibre de pois, fibres de pois
hr: vlakna graška
it: fibra di pisello
nl: erwtenvezel, erwtvezel
pl: błonnik grochowy, błonnik grochu, włókna grochu
ro: fibre de mazare
sv: ärtfiber

en: banana fiber
fr: fibre de plantain
nl: banaanvezel, bananenvezel

en: wheat bran fiber
de: Weizenkleiefaser
es: fibra de salvado de trigo
fr: fibre de son de blé
it: fibra di crusca di grano
nl: tarwezemelvezel
sv: vetekli-fiber

en: chickpea fiber
de: Kichererbsenfaser, Kichererbsenfasern
fr: fibre de pois chiche, fibres de pois chiche
hr: vlakna od slanutka
it: fibra di ceci

en: sugar beet fibre, sugar beet fiber
da: sukkerroefiber, sukkerroefibre, sukkerroe fibre
de: zuckerrübenfaser
fi: sokerijuurikaskuitu
fr: fibre de betterave sucrière
hr: vlakna šećerne repe
it: fibra de barbabietola
nb: sukkerbetefiber
nl: suikerbietvezel
sv: sockerbetsfiber

en: bone
af: Been
am: አጥንት
ar: عظم
as: অস্থি বা হাড়
ay: Ch'aka
az: Sümük
be: косць
bg: Кост
bn: হাড়
br: Askorn
bs: Kost
ca: os
co: Ossu
cs: kost
cv: Шăмă
cy: Asgwrn
da: Knogle
de: Knochen
el: Οστό
eo: osto
es: hueso
et: luu, luud
eu: hezur
fa: استخوان
fi: luu
fo: bein
fr: os
fy: Bonke
ga: Cnámh
gd: Cnàmh
gl: Óso
gn: Kangue
he: עצם
hi: अस्थि
hr: kost, kostiju
ht: Zo
hu: csont
hy: Ոսկոր
ia: Osso
id: Tulang
io: Osto
is: Bein
it: osso
ja: 骨
jv: Balung
ka: ძვალი
kk: Қарға сүйек
kn: ಮೂಳೆ
ko: 뼈
ku: Hestî
la: os
li: Knaok
ln: Mokúwa
lt: Kaulas
lv: Kauls
mk: коска
ml: അസ്ഥി
mn: Яс
mr: अस्थि
ms: Tulang
my: အရိုး
nl: been
nn: bein
oc: òs
or: ହାଡ଼
pa: ਹੱਡੀ
pl: kość
pt: osso
qu: Tullu
ro: Os
ru: кость
sa: अस्थि
sh: Kosti
sk: Kosť
sl: Kost
so: Laf
sq: Eshtrat
sr: кост
su: Tulang
sv: Ben
sw: Mfupa
ta: எலும்பு
te: ఎముక
tg: Устухон
th: กระดูก
tl: Buto
tn: Lerapo
tr: Kemik doku
tt: сөяк
uk: кістка
ur: ہڈی
uz: Suyak
vi: xương
vo: Bom
wa: Oxhea
yo: Egungun
za: Ndok
zh: 骨骼

en: browning
de: Bratensoße
es: browning
fr: dorure
hr: posmeđivanje
it: dorato
nl: verguldsel
pt: pigmento

en: wort
fi: vierre
is: virt
ja: 麦汁
sv: vört
zh: 麥芽汁, 麦汁

en: wort extract
sv: vörtextrakt

en: preparation
da: præparat
it: preparazione
lv: sagatavošana
nl: bereiding
sv: beredning